California, session 20252026, AB2605.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 27700.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:27700.5. (a) The board of supervisors of each county shall specify a contact person with the applicable oversight and collect the following information on public defense services provided in the that county, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Brief explanation of whether the public defense system is a public defender (PD), an alternate public defender (APD), a private attorney program, or a combination of any of these systems.(2) Method and timing of case assignment.(3) Budget and expenditures for each PD, APD, or private attorney system.(4) Funded and filled public defense positions by type, including PD attorney positions, APD attorney positions, and number of active private attorneys in private attorney programs.(5) The number of cases assigned to each PD, APD, or private attorney system specifying the number of homicide, other felony, and misdemeanor cases in adult and juvenile court.(6) Description of the compensation model for each PD, APD, or private attorney program.(b) The data collected by a county pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be reported to the Office of the State Public Defender every two years beginning on January 1, 2029. Any reporting procedures established by the office shall account for structural differences between counties.(c) The Office of the State Public Defender shall create and post on its internet website a summary report of the information reported to it pursuant to subdivision (b).(d) This section shall become operative upon appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.